District of Columbia statutes.
25-113a

License endorsements.

(a)

All license endorsements shall be placed on the applicant’s license.

(b)

The licensee under a license, class C/R, D/R, C/H, D/H, C/T, and D/T, shall obtain an entertainment endorsement from the Board to be eligible to have entertainment, a cover charge, or offer facilities for dancing.

(c)

The licensee under a manufacturer’s license class A or B holding an on-site sales and consumption permit or an on-premises license, class C/R, D/R, C/H, D/H, C/T, D/T, C/N, D/N, C/X, and D/X, shall obtain a sidewalk café endorsement or summer garden endorsement from the Board to be eligible to conduct business operations on a sidewalk café or summer garden, which may include the sale, service, and consumption of alcoholic beverages on outdoor public or private space. The licensee under a manufacturer’s license class A or B holding an on-site sales and consumption permit may be authorized to conduct business operations on a sidewalk cafe or summer garden only between the hours of 1:00 p.m. and 9:00 p.m., 7 days a week.

History

Sept. 30, 2004, D.C. Law 15-187, § 301(c), 51 DCR 6525
designated § 301(d), Apr. 13, 2005, D.C. Law 15-354, § 102(a)(1), 52 DCR 2638
May 2, 2015, D.C. Law 20-270, § 2(a)(5), 62 DCR 1866
Oct. 22, 2015, D.C. Law 21-36, § 2062, 62 DCR 10905

Effect of Amendments

The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 20-270 substituted “C/N, D/N, C/X, and D/X,” for “C/N, and D/N” in (c).
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 21-36, in (c), added “a manufacturer's license class A or B holding an on-site sales and consumption permit or” in the first sentence, and added the last sentence.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 2062 of the Fiscal Year 2016 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-127, July 27, 2015, 62 DCR 10201).